Illinois, session 104th, HB3714.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5changing Section 5-4.5-15, 5-4.5-45, 5-4.5-55, 5-4.5-60, and 65-4.5-65 as follows: 7    (730 ILCS 5/5-4.5-15)8    Sec. 5-4.5-15. DISPOSITIONS. 9    (a) APPROPRIATE DISPOSITIONS. The following are 10appropriate dispositions, alone or in combination, for all 11felonies and misdemeanors other than as provided in Section 125-5-3 (730 ILCS 5/5-5-3) or as specifically provided in the 13statute defining the offense or elsewhere:14        (1) A period of probation.15        (2) A term of periodic imprisonment.16        (3) A term of conditional discharge.17        (3.1) An unconditional sentence. 18        (4) A term of imprisonment.19        (5) A fine.20        (6) Restitution to the victim.21        (7) Participation in an impact incarceration program.22        (8) A term of imprisonment in combination with a term 23    of probation when the offender has been admitted into a   HB3714- 2 -LRB104 11222 RLC 21304 b1    drug court program.2        (9) If the defendant is convicted of arson, aggravated 3    arson, residential arson, or place of worship arson, an 4    order directing the offender to reimburse the local 5    emergency response department for the costs of responding 6    to the fire that the offender was convicted of setting in 7    accordance with the Emergency Services Response 8    Reimbursement for Criminal Convictions Act. 9    (b) FINE; RESTITUTION; NOT SOLE DISPOSITION. Neither a 10fine nor restitution shall be the sole disposition for a 11felony, and either or both may be imposed only in conjunction 12with another disposition. 13    (c) PAROLE; MANDATORY SUPERVISED RELEASE. Except when a 14term of natural life is imposed, every sentence includes a 15term in addition to the term of imprisonment. For those 16sentenced under the law in effect before February 1, 1978, 17that term is a parole term. For those sentenced on or after 18February 1, 1978, that term is a mandatory supervised release 19term.20    (d)(1) CRITERIA FOR UNCONDITIONAL SENTENCE. If the 21defendant has been incarcerated for a Class 4 felony or a Class 22A, B, or C misdemeanor and has been released from 23imprisonment, the court shall impose an unconditional sentence 24in any case in which the court is of the opinion that no proper 25purpose would be served by imposing any condition upon the 26defendant's release. When an unconditional sentence is imposed   HB3714- 3 -LRB104 11222 RLC 21304 b1for a felony, the court shall set forth in the record the 2reasons for its action.3    (2) SENTENCE. When the court imposes an unconditional 4sentence, the defendant shall be released with respect to the 5conviction for which the sentence is imposed without any 6conditions of parole or mandatory supervised release. An 7unconditional sentence discharges the defendant from any 8additional obligations imposed for conviction of the offense. 9(Source: P.A. 95-1052, eff. 7-1-09; incorporates P.A. 96-400, 10eff. 8-13-09; 96-1000, eff. 7-2-10.) 11    (730 ILCS 5/5-4.5-45)12    Sec. 5-4.5-45. CLASS 4 FELONIES; SENTENCE. For a Class 4 13felony:14    (a) TERM. The sentence of imprisonment shall be a 15determinate sentence of not less than one year and not more 16than 3 years. The sentence of imprisonment for an extended 17term Class 4 felony, as provided in Section 5-8-2 (730 ILCS 185/5-8-2), shall be a term not less than 3 years and not more 19than 6 years. 20    (b) PERIODIC IMPRISONMENT. A sentence of periodic 21imprisonment shall be for a definite term of up to 18 months, 22except as otherwise provided in Section 5-5-3 or 5-7-1 (730 23ILCS 5/5-5-3 or 5/5-7-1). 24    (c) IMPACT INCARCERATION. See Sections 5-8-1.1 and 5-8-1.2 25(730 ILCS 5/5-8-1.1 and 5/5-8-1.2) concerning eligibility for   HB3714- 4 -LRB104 11222 RLC 21304 b1the impact incarceration program or the county impact 2incarceration program. 3    (d) PROBATION; CONDITIONAL DISCHARGE. Except as provided 4in Section 5-5-3 or 5-6-2 (730 ILCS 5/5-5-3 or 5/5-6-2), the 5period of probation or conditional discharge shall not exceed 630 months. The court shall specify the conditions of probation 7or conditional discharge as set forth in Section 5-6-3 (730 8ILCS 5/5-6-3). 9    (e) FINE. Fines may be imposed as provided in Section 105-4.5-50(b) (730 ILCS 5/5-4.5-50(b)). 11    (f) RESTITUTION. See Section 5-5-6 (730 ILCS 5/5-5-6) 12concerning restitution. 13    (g) CONCURRENT OR CONSECUTIVE SENTENCE. The sentence shall 14be concurrent or consecutive as provided in Section 5-8-4 (730 15ILCS 5/5-8-4) and Section 5-4.5-50 (730 ILCS 5/5-4.5-50). 16    (h) DRUG COURT. See Section 20 of the Drug Court Treatment 17Act (730 ILCS 166/20) concerning eligibility for a drug court 18program. 19    (i) CREDIT FOR HOME DETENTION. See Section 5-4.5-100 (730 20ILCS 5/5-4.5-100) concerning credit for time spent in home 21detention prior to judgment. 22    (j) SENTENCE CREDIT. See Section 3-6-3 of this Code (730 23ILCS 5/3-6-3) or the County Jail Good Behavior Allowance Act 24(730 ILCS 130/) for rules and regulations for sentence credit. 25    (k) ELECTRONIC MONITORING AND HOME DETENTION. See Section 265-8A-3 (730 ILCS 5/5-8A-3) concerning eligibility for   HB3714- 5 -LRB104 11222 RLC 21304 b1electronic monitoring and home detention. 2    (l) PAROLE; MANDATORY SUPERVISED RELEASE. Except as 3provided in Section 3-3-8 or 5-8-1 (730 ILCS 5/3-3-8 or 45/5-8-1), the parole or mandatory supervised release term 5shall be one year upon release from imprisonment. 6    (m) UNCONDITIONAL SENTENCE. See Section 5-4.5-15. 7(Source: P.A. 100-431, eff. 8-25-17.) 8    (730 ILCS 5/5-4.5-55)9    Sec. 5-4.5-55. CLASS A MISDEMEANORS; SENTENCE. For a Class 10A misdemeanor:11    (a) TERM. The sentence of imprisonment shall be a 12determinate sentence of less than one year. 13    (b) PERIODIC IMPRISONMENT. A sentence of periodic 14imprisonment shall be for a definite term of less than one 15year, except as otherwise provided in Section 5-5-3 or 5-7-1 16(730 ILCS 5/5-5-3 or 5/5-7-1). 17    (c) IMPACT INCARCERATION. See Section 5-8-1.2 (730 ILCS 185/5-8-1.2) concerning eligibility for the county impact 19incarceration program. 20    (d) PROBATION; CONDITIONAL DISCHARGE. Except as provided 21in Section 5-5-3 or 5-6-2 (730 ILCS 5/5-5-3 or 5/5-6-2), the 22period of probation or conditional discharge shall not exceed 232 years. The court shall specify the conditions of probation 24or conditional discharge as set forth in Section 5-6-3 (730 25ILCS 5/5-6-3).   HB3714- 6 -LRB104 11222 RLC 21304 b1    (e) FINE. Unless otherwise specified by law, the minimum 2fine is $75. A fine not to exceed $2,500 for each offense or 3the amount specified in the offense, whichever is greater, may 4be imposed. A fine may be imposed in addition to a sentence of 5conditional discharge, probation, periodic imprisonment, or 6imprisonment. See Article 9 of Chapter V (730 ILCS 5/Ch. V, 7Art. 9) for imposition of additional amounts and determination 8of amounts and payment. If the court finds that the fine would 9impose an undue burden on the victim, the court may reduce or 10waive the fine.11    (f) RESTITUTION. See Section 5-5-6 (730 ILCS 5/5-5-6) 12concerning restitution. 13    (g) CONCURRENT OR CONSECUTIVE SENTENCE. The sentence shall 14be concurrent or consecutive as provided in Section 5-8-4 (730 15ILCS 5/5-8-4). 16    (h) DRUG COURT. See Section 20 of the Drug Court Treatment 17Act (730 ILCS 166/20) concerning eligibility for a drug court 18program. 19    (i) CREDIT FOR HOME DETENTION. See Section 5-4.5-100 (730 20ILCS 5/5-4.5-100) concerning credit for time spent in home 21detention prior to judgment. 22    (j) GOOD BEHAVIOR ALLOWANCE. See the County Jail Good 23Behavior Allowance Act (730 ILCS 130/) for rules and 24regulations for good behavior allowance. 25    (k) ELECTRONIC MONITORING AND HOME DETENTION. See Section 265-8A-3 (730 ILCS 5/5-8A-3) concerning eligibility for   HB3714- 7 -LRB104 11222 RLC 21304 b1electronic monitoring and home detention. 2    (l) UNCONDITIONAL SENTENCE. See Section 5-4.5-15. 3(Source: P.A. 100-431, eff. 8-25-17; 100-987, eff. 7-1-19; 4100-1161, eff. 7-1-19.) 5    (730 ILCS 5/5-4.5-60)6    Sec. 5-4.5-60. CLASS B MISDEMEANORS; SENTENCE. For a Class 7B misdemeanor:8    (a) TERM. The sentence of imprisonment shall be a 9determinate sentence of not more than 6 months. 10    (b) PERIODIC IMPRISONMENT. A sentence of periodic 11imprisonment shall be for a definite term of up to 6 months or 12as otherwise provided in Section 5-7-1 (730 ILCS 5/5-7-1). 13    (c) IMPACT INCARCERATION. See Section 5-8-1.2 (730 ILCS 145/5-8-1.2) concerning eligibility for the county impact 15incarceration program. 16    (d) PROBATION; CONDITIONAL DISCHARGE. Except as provided 17in Section 5-6-2 (730 ILCS 5/5-6-2), the period of probation 18or conditional discharge shall not exceed 2 years. The court 19shall specify the conditions of probation or conditional 20discharge as set forth in Section 5-6-3 (730 ILCS 5/5-6-3). 21    (e) FINE. Unless otherwise specified by law, the minimum 22fine is $75. A fine not to exceed $1,500 for each offense or 23the amount specified in the offense, whichever is greater, may 24be imposed. A fine may be imposed in addition to a sentence of 25conditional discharge, probation, periodic imprisonment, or   HB3714- 8 -LRB104 11222 RLC 21304 b1imprisonment. See Article 9 of Chapter V (730 ILCS 5/Ch. V, 2Art. 9) for imposition of additional amounts and determination 3of amounts and payment. If the court finds that the fine would 4impose an undue burden on the victim, the court may reduce or 5waive the fine.6    (f) RESTITUTION. See Section 5-5-6 (730 ILCS 5/5-5-6) 7concerning restitution. 8    (g) CONCURRENT OR CONSECUTIVE SENTENCE. The sentence shall 9be concurrent or consecutive as provided in Section 5-8-4 (730 10ILCS 5/5-8-4). 11    (h) DRUG COURT. See Section 20 of the Drug Court Treatment 12Act (730 ILCS 166/20) concerning eligibility for a drug court 13program. 14    (i) CREDIT FOR HOME DETENTION. See Section 5-4.5-100 (730 15ILCS 5/5-4.5-100) concerning credit for time spent in home 16detention prior to judgment. 17    (j) GOOD BEHAVIOR ALLOWANCE. See the County Jail Good 18Behavior Allowance Act (730 ILCS 130/) for rules and 19regulations for good behavior allowance. 20    (k) ELECTRONIC MONITORING AND HOME DETENTION. See Section 215-8A-3 (730 ILCS 5/5-8A-3) concerning eligibility for 22electronic monitoring and home detention. 23    (l) UNCONDITIONAL SENTENCE. See Section 5-4.5-15. 24(Source: P.A. 100-431, eff. 8-25-17; 100-987, eff. 7-1-19; 25100-1161, eff. 7-1-19.)   HB3714- 9 -LRB104 11222 RLC 21304 b1    (730 ILCS 5/5-4.5-65)2    Sec. 5-4.5-65. CLASS C MISDEMEANORS; SENTENCE. For a Class 3C misdemeanor:4    (a) TERM. The sentence of imprisonment shall be a 5determinate sentence of not more than 30 days. 6    (b) PERIODIC IMPRISONMENT. A sentence of periodic 7imprisonment shall be for a definite term of up to 30 days or 8as otherwise provided in Section 5-7-1 (730 ILCS 5/5-7-1). 9    (c) IMPACT INCARCERATION. See Section 5-8-1.2 (730 ILCS 105/5-8-1.2) concerning eligibility for the county impact 11incarceration program. 12    (d) PROBATION; CONDITIONAL DISCHARGE. Except as provided 13in Section 5-6-2 (730 ILCS 5/5-6-2), the period of probation 14or conditional discharge shall not exceed 2 years. The court 15shall specify the conditions of probation or conditional 16discharge as set forth in Section 5-6-3 (730 ILCS 5/5-6-3). 17    (e) FINE. Unless otherwise specified by law, the minimum 18fine is $75. A fine not to exceed $1,500 for each offense or 19the amount specified in the offense, whichever is greater, may 20be imposed. A fine may be imposed in addition to a sentence of 21conditional discharge, probation, periodic imprisonment, or 22imprisonment. See Article 9 of Chapter V (730 ILCS 5/Ch. V, 23Art. 9) for imposition of additional amounts and determination 24of amounts and payment. If the court finds that the fine would 25impose an undue burden on the victim, the court may reduce or 26waive the fine.   HB3714- 10 -LRB104 11222 RLC 21304 b1    (f) RESTITUTION. See Section 5-5-6 (730 ILCS 5/5-5-6) 2concerning restitution. 3    (g) CONCURRENT OR CONSECUTIVE SENTENCE. The sentence shall 4be concurrent or consecutive as provided in Section 5-8-4 (730 5ILCS 5/5-8-4). 6    (h) DRUG COURT. See Section 20 of the Drug Court Treatment 7Act (730 ILCS 166/20) concerning eligibility for a drug court 8program. 9    (i) CREDIT FOR HOME DETENTION. See Section 5-4.5-100 (730 10ILCS 5/5-4.5-100) concerning credit for time spent in home 11detention prior to judgment. 12    (j) GOOD BEHAVIOR ALLOWANCE. See the County Jail Good 13Behavior Allowance Act (730 ILCS 130/) for rules and 14regulations for good behavior allowance. 15    (k) ELECTRONIC MONITORING AND HOME DETENTION. See Section 165-8A-3 (730 ILCS 5/5-8A-3) concerning eligibility for 17electronic monitoring and home detention. 18    (l) UNCONDITIONAL SENTENCE. See Section 5-4.5-15. 19(Source: P.A. 100-431, eff. 8-25-17; 100-987, eff. 7-1-19; 20100-1161, eff. 7-1-19.)